hu: Doumbek fejtípusa: Természetes bőr (hagyományos); Szintetikus előhangolt (rögzített); Szintetikus hangolható (kávás/csavaros); Egyéb
sv: Doumbek – typ av skinn: Naturligt skinn (traditionellt); Syntetiskt förstämt (fast); Syntetiskt stämbart (sarg/skruvar); Övrigt
nb: Doumbek-hodetype: Naturskinn (tradisjonelt); Syntetisk ferdigstemt (fast); Syntetisk stembar (kant/stemmeskruer); Annet
es: Tipo de cabeza del doumbek: Piel natural (tradicional); Sintético preafinado (fijo); Sintético afinable (aro/tensores); Otro
lt-LT: Doumbek membranos tipas: Natūrali oda (tradicinė); Sintetinė iš anksto suderinta (fiksuota); Sintetinė derinama (lankelis / varžtai); Kita
nl: Doumbek veltype: Natuurlijke huid (traditioneel); Synthetisch voorgestemd (vast); Synthetisch stembaar (rand/spanblokken); Overige
fi: Doumbekin rumpukalvotyyppi: Luonnonnahka (perinteinen); Synteettinen valmiiksi viritetty (kiinteä); Synteettinen viritettävä (vanne/kiristimet); Muu
vi: Loại mặt trống doumbek: Da tự nhiên (truyền thống); Tổng hợp lên dây sẵn (cố định); Tổng hợp có thể lên dây (vành/chốt); Khác
zh-CN: 杜姆贝克鼓的鼓面类型: 天然皮革（传统）; 合成材料预调音（固定）; 合成材料可调音（鼓圈/拉耳）; 其他
bg-BG: Тип мембрана на думбека: Естествена кожа (традиционна); Синтетична предварително настроена (фиксирана); Синтетична с настройка (обръч/лъгове); Друго
ja: ドゥンベックのヘッドタイプ: 天然皮革 (伝統的); 合成素材 プレチューン (固定); 合成素材 チューニング可能 (リム/ラグ); その他
pl: Typ naciągu doumbeku: Skóra naturalna (tradycyjna); Syntetyczny wstępnie nastrojony (stały); Syntetyczny strojony (obręcz/śruby); Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta opne za doumbek: Naravna koža (tradicionalno); Sintetično, predhodno uglašeno (fiksno); Sintetično, mogoče uglasiti (obroč/vijaki); Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de cabeça Doumbek: Pele natural (tradicional); Sintético pré-afinado (fixo); Sintético afinável (aro/afinadores); Outro
en: Doumbek head type: Natural skin (traditional); Synthetic pre-tuned (fixed); Synthetic tunable (rim/lugs); Other
zh-TW: 杜姆貝克鼓鼓面類型: 天然皮革 (傳統式); 合成材質預調音 (固定式); 合成材質可調音 (鼓框/鼓耳); 其他
it: Tipo di testa Doumbek: Pelle naturale (tradizionale); Sintetico preaccordato (fisso); Sintetico accordabile (cerchio/tiranti); Altro
tr: Darbuka kafa tipi: Doğal deri (geleneksel); Sentetik önceden akortlu (sabit); Sentetik akort edilebilir (kasnak/kulplar); Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça do doumbek: Pele natural (tradicional); Sintética pré-afinada (fixa); Sintética afinável (aro/castanhas); Outros
ru: Тип мембраны думбека: Натуральная кожа (традиционная); Синтетическая предварительно настроенная (фиксированная); Синтетическая настраиваемая (обод/лаги); Другое
ko: 둠벡 헤드 유형: 천연 가죽(전통식); 합성 프리튠(고정형); 합성 튜너블(림/러그); 기타
cs: Typ hlavy Doumbek: Přírodní kůže (tradiční); Syntetická předladěná (pevná); Syntetická laditelná (ráfek/mušle); Jiné
sk-SK: Typ membrány bubna na doumbeku: Prírodná koža (tradičná); Syntetická predladená (pevná); Syntetická laditeľná (okraj/skrutky); Iný
fr: Type de peau du doumbek: Peau naturelle (traditionnelle); Synthétique pré-accordée (fixe); Synthétique accordable (cercle/tirants); Autre
hr-HR: Doumbek tip glave: Prirodna koža (tradicionalna); Sintetička unaprijed ugođena (fiksna); Sintetička s mogućnošću ugađanja (obruč/vijci); Ostalo
th: ประเภทของหนังกลองดุมเบก: หนังธรรมชาติ (ดั้งเดิม); หนังสังเคราะห์ปรับเสียงล่วงหน้า (แบบยึดติด); หนังสังเคราะห์ปรับเสียงได้ (ขอบ/สกรูดึง); อื่นๆ
de: Art des Doumbek-Fells: Naturfell (traditionell); Synthetisch vorgestimmt (fixiert); Synthetisch stimmbar (Spannreifen/Böckchen); Sonstige
da: Doumbek-hovedtype: Naturligt skind (traditionelt); Syntetisk forudstemt (fast); Syntetisk stembar (kant/spændehuse); Andet
ro-RO: Tipul membranei de doumbek: Piele naturală (tradițional); Sintetic pre-acordat (fix); Sintetic acordabil (ramă/șuruburi); Altele
el: Τύπος κεφαλής ντουμπέκ: Φυσικό δέρμα (παραδοσιακό); Συνθετικό προκουρδισμένο (σταθερό); Συνθετικό κουρδιζόμενο (στεφάνι/κλειδιά); Άλλο